Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4608
Claimant; rights; recovery under
act; effect.

Nothing
in the Nebraska Claims for Wrongful Conviction and Imprisonment Act shall
limit the claimant from making any other claim available against any other
party or based upon any other theory of recovery, except that a claimant who
recovers a claim under the act shall not have any other claim against the
state based upon any other theory of recovery or law.

Laws 2009, LB260, § 8.